trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_bre">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bre</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bre</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bent</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bent</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bu</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bo</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ps</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pi2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bi</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bí</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>br</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bí</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bé</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bér</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bé</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>br</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bi</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bem</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beu</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bin</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bi</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bem</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beu</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bin</l>
          <r>bre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

      <e>
        <i>perce</i>
        <par n="CM_bre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="CM_bre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>conce</i>
        <par n="CM_bre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dece</i>
        <par n="CM_bre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ca</i>
        <par n="CM_bre"/>
      </e>
